Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201575-343
Report; contents.

The commission shall electronically provide the Legislature with an annual report before December 31 of each year on the status of the implementation of sections 75-323 to 75-342. The report shall describe (1) the number of permits issued pursuant to section 75-324, (2) a description of any revocation proceedings involving permits issued under sections 75-323 to 75-342, (3) the number of rides provided by taxicab carriers relative to historical numbers, (4) the number of taxicabs operated by taxicab carriers relative to historical numbers, (5) the number of drivers either employed or contracted by taxicab carriers relative to historical numbers, (6) the number of taxicab carriers authorized by the commission relative to historical numbers, and (7) any other information in its possession that the commission believes will assist the Legislature in evaluating the effectiveness of sections 75-323 to 75-342. The report shall also address the question of the need for further legislation to achieve the purposes of sections 75-323 to 75-342.

Laws 2015, LB629, § 22.
May 28, 2015